Tennessee, session 114, SB1561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (67).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee State University, board of trustees, created by §§ 49-8-101 and
49-8-201;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1561
010119
- 1 -